Florida, session 2026, SB842.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 145.051, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 145.051âClerk of circuit court; county comptroller.â 14 (1)âEach clerk of the circuit court and each county 15 comptroller shall receive as salary the amount indicated, based 16 on the population of his or her county. In addition, a 17 compensation shall be made for population increments over the 18 minimum for each population group, which shall be determined by 19 multiplying the population in excess of the minimum for the 20 group times the group rate. 21 22 Pop. Group County Pop. Range Base Salary Group Rate 23 Minimum Maximum 24 I -0- 49,999$26,250 $21,250 $0.07875 25 II 50,000 99,99929,400 24,400 0.06300 26 III 100,000 199,99932,550 27,550 0.02625 27 IV 200,000 399,99935,175 30,175 0.01575 28 V 400,000 999,99938,325 33,325 0.00525 29 VI 1,000,000 41,475 36,475 0.00400 30 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 145.09, Florida 31 Statutes, is amended to read: 32 145.09âSupervisor of elections.â 33 (1)âEach supervisor of elections shall receive as salary 34 the amount indicated, based on the population of his or her 35 county. In addition, a compensation shall be made for population 36 increments over the minimum for each population group, which 37 shall be determined by multiplying the population in excess of 38 the minimum for the group times the group rate. 39 40 Pop. Group County Pop. Range Base Salary Group Rate 41 Minimum Maximum 42 I -0- 49,999$26,250 $21,250 $0.07875 43 II 50,000 99,99929,400 24,400 0.06300 44 III 100,000 199,99932,550 27,550 0.02625 45 IV 200,000 399,99935,175 30,175 0.01575 46 V 400,000 999,99938,325 33,325 0.00525 47 VI 1,000,000 41,475 36,475 0.00400 48 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.